District of Columbia statutes.
46-226.01

Child support enforcement funding.

(a)

The following payments received by the District under Part D of Title IV of the Social Security Act, approved January 4, 1975 (88 Stat. 2351; 42 U.S.C. § 651 et seq.), and appropriated by Congress shall be allocated exclusively to the IV-D agency for the purpose of funding for the IV-D program:

(1)

Reimbursements from the federal government for fixed percentages of the costs of administering the IV-D program;

(2)

Incentive payments received by the District based on the performance of the District’s IV-D program;

(3)

Support collections retained by the District pursuant to section 457 of the Social Security Act, approved January 4, 1975 (88 Stat. 2356; 42 U.S.C. § 657); and

(4)

Reimbursements and fees received in connection with the operation of the IV-D program.

(b)

The payments specified in subsection (a)(2), (3), and (4) of this section shall not lapse at the end of any fiscal year or at any other time, but shall continue to be available to the IV-D agency for the purpose of funding the IV-D program until expended, subject to authorization by Congress in an appropriations act.

(c)

The payments allocated to the IV-D agency pursuant to subsection (a) of this section shall be in addition to the annual appropriation for the IV-D agency.

Feb. 24, 1987, D.C. Law 6-166, § 27a
as added Aug. 17, 1991, D.C. Law 9-39, § 4(c), 38 DCR 4970
Nov 13, 2003, D.C. Law 15-39, § 902, 50 DCR 5668
1981 Ed., § 30-526.1.
D.C. Law 15-39 rewrote the section which had read as follows: “§ 46-226.01. Funding.” “Incentive payments received by the District under title IV-D of the Social Security Act ( 42 U.S.C. § 651 et seq.), based upon the District’s IV-D program performance, and payments for fixed percentages of the costs of administering the IV-D program, which are reimbursed by the federal government, shall be appropriated to the IV-D agency for the purpose of funding for the program. This amount shall be in addition to the annual appropriation for the IV-D agency and the IV-D agency shall spend those funds as though appropriated through the annual appropriation for the year in which they are received.”
For temporary repeal of D.C. Law 12-103, see § 13 of the Child Support and Welfare Reform Compliance Second Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-439, August 12, 1998, 45 DCR 6110).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 902 of Fiscal Year 2004 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-105, June 20, 2003, 50 DCR 5613).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 902 of Fiscal Year 2004 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-149, September 22, 2003, 50 DCR 8360).
Short title of title IX of Law 15-39: Section 901 of D.C. Law 15-39 provided that title IX of the act may be cited as the Child Support Enforcement Program Funding Amendment Act of 2003.